Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.040

Motor fuel registration.

All motor fuel shall be registered by the name, brand, or trademark under which it will be sold at the terminal. Registration shall include:

(1) The name and address of the person registering the motor fuel;

(2) The antiknock index or cetane number, as appropriate, at which the motor fuel is to be marketed;

(3) A certification, declaration, or affidavit that each individual grade or type of motor fuel shall conform to this chapter.

[ 1990 c 102 s 5.]